src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
iḷunŋuruq ! stomach hurts
iḷunŋutchaktuq ! is deeply angry, hurt, disturbed
iḷuvviktuq ! buries (N)
imaiqsuq ! is low (water in river)
imaqaqtuq ! is full
imaqsiruq ! moistens skin
imigluktuq ! earring
iminŋuruq ! has a hangover (K)
imiqtuq ! drinks
imiqtaqtuq ! is going for water
imiġuktuq ! is thirsty
immaqtuq ! is leaking
immiġaa   ! fills it
immiqsuq ! is full
imñiqsaktuq ! groans
imŋaluktuq ! whines
imŋaluktuq ! whines (dog), hums (person)
inillaktuq ! is placing
inillakkaa ! is placing it
innaittuq ! the like of, such kind (N)
inuqtuq ! is insufficient, fails to reach it, shoots low
ipiruq ! suffocates, smothers, drowns
ipiktuq ! is sharp
ipiktusuktuq ! is sad, despondent
ipiqtusuktuq ! is despondent, sad (N)
ipitkaa ! suffocates him, smothers him, drowns him
ipiġaqtuq ! wades, cuts himself
ipiġaqtuġaa   ! whips him
ipnaiqtuq ! goes to a cliff
ipquruq ! is dirty
ipuaqtuq ! rows (N)
ipuktaqtuq ! see-saw jumping (K)
iputtuq ! rows (K)
ipyanŋunaqtuq ! is stuffy (K)
iqalugniaqtuq ! is fishing (N, q)
iqaluktuq ! catches a fish (N, q)
iqaqsriruq ! washes clothes (N)
iqatauruq ! is together with (K)
iqiasruktuq ! is lazy (K)
iqiasuktuq ! is lazy
iqiasuktuq ! lazy
iqiatkaa ! does not want to do it, is lazy
iqiatchaktuq ! (moon) begins to wane
iqquliruq ! skins muskrat (by cutting the belly section)
iqsiruq ! fears
iqsiruq ! fears (general, most common)
iqsigigaa ! is afraid of him
iqsisaaqtuq ! frightens away an attacking animal (K)
iqsruqtuqtuq ! builds a house (K)
iqsuktuq ! responds negatively by wrinkling nose
iqsuktaqtuq ! wrinkles nose
iqłaqtuqtuq ! is jigging, is hooking mudshark (K), is hooking tomcod (q)
irinŋuruq ! eye hurts
iriqtuq ! hides
irriŋuġaa   ! is icy cold (N)
irrutigaa ! treats him properly, right
isaaqtuq ! raises his arms (N)
isaaŋaruq ! reaches forth
isaġutiruq ! beings
isiḷġiġaa   ! corrects his misundertanding
isimŋaaqtuq ! line of gently sloping hills
isiqtuq ! enters, visits
isiqattaaqtuq ! is visiting
isiqsiruq ! is getting smoke filled
isiqsuruq ! is daring (strong), is enduring (persistent hunter) (K)
isivġiiruq ! judges (N)
isivġiigaa ! examines him, tries him out
isiġniataktuq ! is trying to enter
israktuq ! raises his arms (K)
isrumaruq ! thinks (K)
isrumaaluktuq ! worries (K)
isrumanŋuruq ! holds a grudge (K)
isruqtuq ! is opaque, is muddy, not clear (K)
isumaruq ! thinks (N, q)
isumaaqtuq ! mourns (not expressed), worries (K)
isumalitqigaa ! repents of it (lit. rethinks it)
isumanŋuruq ! holds a grudge (N)
isumanŋutchautiruq ! argues heatedly
isumatturuq ! is wise
isumaturuq ! is wise
isummaqpaktuq ! is sorrowing much
isuqtuq ! is opaque, is muddy, not clear
ittuq ! exists, is, lives, stays
itchuqtuq ! waits for an animal to appear (K)
itiruq ! is deep
itiktaqtuq ! has diarrhea
itiqtuq ! wakes up
itivliruq ! is sleepwalking, talking in his sleep
itiġnaġiaqtuq ! arises early
itnaqtuq ! the like of, such kind (K)
itqanaiqsuq ! is ready, finished
itqaqtuq ! remembers
itqaqtiġaa   ! it comes to mind (K)
itqatauŋaruq ! is together with (N)
itqaġigaa ! remembers it
itqaġmiraqtuq ! he habitually remembers
itqumaruq ! is awake, is not sleeping
itqutchiġnaqsiruq ! is breakfast time
itraiqsuq ! has moderated (having been cold) (K)
itriŋuġaa   ! is icy cold (K)
ivaruq ! is nesting
ivaktuq ! searches (N)
ivaluktuq ! flaps (N)
ivalukataqtuq ! is flapping (slowly)
ivalukkattaaqtuq ! is flapping (rapidly)
ivayaqtuġaa   ! defrauds, robs him (K)
ivaġiaqtuq ! is going to search
iviktuq ! fits
iviġaktuq ! pleases
ivukutaqtuq ! flaps (K)
ivvaqtuq ! bathes (N)
ivyanŋunaqtuq ! is stuffy (N)
iñigaa ! hangs (fish or net for dryingj) over a pole
iñiqsiruq ! made, created (K)
iñiqtiġaa   ! threatened him
iñiqtiqtuq ! is threatening (scolding that brings results)
iñiqtiqtuq ! rebuked him, permitted him not
iñiqtuqtuq ! is tired (K)
iñugiaktuq ! are many
iñugiiḷiqsuq ! frowns (lit. makes himself ugly)
iñugiksuq ! is a good or pretty person
iñugiksuq ! is handsome, beautiful
iñuguqtuq ! became a man (having grown up)
iñuguqtuq ! grew up (lit. became a person)
iñukpalliktuq ! comes from, originates
iñulluataqtuq ! is a good man
iñunŋunaqtuq ! is naughty (lit. evokes a person to pain) (K)
iñuuruq ! lives
iñuuniaqtuq ! makes a living, lives
iñuŋniqsuq ! is a gentleman
iññiaqtuq ! is visiting (K)
iññiaqsiruq ! stretches hide on frame
iġitchaqtuq ! plucks fowl
iġḷigigaa ! clings to it for himself, is stingy with it
iġḷiktuq ! is stingy
iġḷituruq ! is stingy (n, K)
iġñiruq ! gives birth, has a baby
iġñiqaġniaqtuq ! will have a son
iġġialaruq ! yells, shouts
iġġuqsiruq ! washes clothes (K)
iłuaqtuq ! is right, good, correct, fitting
iłuaqquġuuruq ! is proper, honest
iłuaqsiruq ! heals, fixes
iłuaqsiruq ! recovers
iłuaqsruqtuq ! corrects person who is erring ignorantly
iłuiḷḷiuqtuq ! is troubled, bad conscience
iŋiġaa   ! asks him, begs him, prays to him
iŋiqsruqtuq ! asks, prays (K)
iŋiuliuqtuq ! pitches (boat)
iŋutuq ! young female (choice whale, soft muktuk)
kaaktuq ! is hungry (N)
kaimuġaqtuq ! pushes heavy sled (N)
kaivaŋaruq ! is dizzy (N)
kaivittuq ! circles around (K)
kaivḷuktuq ! pushes heavy sled
kakaaktuq ! carries on head or shoulders
kakiruq ! pricksq
kakkaaqtuq ! is starving, starved to death
kakkiruq ! blows nose
kakkiñŋuruq ! has a stuffy nose
kalaktuq ! burps (N, q)
kalaktuq ! clears throat
kalikkaa ! drags it
kalitkaa ! pulls it, drags it behind
kalivittuq ! is stuck
kallularuq ! is thundering
kamagigaa ! obeys him
kamaksriruq ! obeys
kamaksriugaqtuq ! is always obedient
kamanaqtuq ! is great, is to be honored
kamanałhaaqtuq ! is greater
kamasaaqtuq ! is boastful (N, q)
kamasraaqtuq ! is boastful (K)
kamatchaktuq ! is surprised at another's ability, takes pride in another's ability
kananiittuq ! is down there (visible)
kanŋusruktuq ! is ashamed, bashful (K)
kanŋusuktuq ! is ashamed, bashful (N)
kanŋusuuruq ! is shy
kanŋutchiaqtuq ! is embarrassed
kapiruq ! stabs
kapyaliqsuq ! worries, gets dizzy, has a headache (K)
kasuŋaruq ! is loose (e.g. rope tied loosely around pole) (N)
kataktuq ! is falling
katakkaa ! drops it
katittuq ! gathers
katitkaa ! gathers it
kauktuq ! hammers (K)
kautaqtuq ! hammers (N)
kaviqsuq ! is red
kayuqtuq ! fox (K)
kayuqtuq ! red fox (N)
kayuŋiutigaa ! coaxes him, urges him (K)
kaŋataliiktaktuq ! to rumble (as a moving sled)
kaŋiqsiruq ! understands
kiavluktuq ! circles around (N)
kigiraqtuq ! is crimping soles (K)
kigutinŋuruq ! has a toothache
kiigaa ! answers him (K)
kiiqsiuqtuq ! is painful
kiiraqtuq ! is crimping soles (N)
kiiñaġiiliruq ! blushes
kikiaktuutigaa ! crucifies him (lit. nails him)
kiliktuq ! tells news, warns
kiliktauruq ! is being warned
kiliktuġaa   ! tells him news, warns him
killaiyaqtuq ! mends, sews
killukuaqtuq ! errs
killukuaqtuq ! goes wrong way
killuqsaqtuq ! sinned (K)
kiluaqtuq ! is ripped
kiluusaġaa   ! locks it
kiluusaqsimaruq ! is locked
kiḷiigruktuq ! has skinned self, abrased
kiḷiqsuq ! has cut self
kinataqtuq ! brakes sled
kiniqtuq ! thick soup
kinnauruq ! is foolish
kinnaŋaaqsiruq ! is becoming senile
kipalukkaa ! works for him, helps him
kipaluniktuq ! has helpers
kipiqniuqtuq ! is anxious to (K)
kipiġiruq ! is anxious to
kipiġniuqtuq ! is anxious to (N)
kipliġaa   ! cuts it in two, severs it
kipriruq ! cuts off, severs (K)
kirratchaiqtitkaa ! shines brightly
kirriruq ! cuts off, severs (N)
kirriqsiruq ! has a fever
kisimġiuqtuq ! is alone
kisiŋŋuġaa   ! left him alone, left her bereaved
kitñuruq ! capsizes
kiugaa ! answers him (N)
kiugiññaġaa   ! is merely answering him
kiviruq ! sinks
kiviktuq ! lifts
kivikkaa ! lifts it
kiviliqtuq ! cannot recall word or name, forget
kivluktuq ! cuts across
kivsiruq ! is startled awake while dozing off
kiñuġautiruq ! is too late (K)
kiŋiaqtuq ! turns head (K)
kiŋiaqtuq ! turns head, looks behind (K)
kiŋmaqtuq ! bites
kiŋuruq ! capsizes (N)
kiŋuvaannaktuq ! inherits (N)
kiŋuġautchiruq ! is too late (N)
kukiḷuktuq ! goes about from place to place
kukiuruq ! is cooking (N)
kukkiḷiruq ! picks teeth
kumiktuq ! scratches
kunikkaa ! kisses him
kuraqtuq ! looks down
kurraqtuq ! looks down, lowers head
kusiksuq ! is dripping
kuukpiaqtuqtuq ! is drinking coffee
kuviruq ! pours
kuvigaa ! pours it
kuvigaa ! pours it out
kuvraqtuq ! netted fish
kuvraqsruqtuq ! checks net
kuvriruq ! makes net
kuvriqsuq ! is setting net
kuvriqiruq ! checks net
kuyakkaa ! lies with her
maguruq ! howls (dog, wolf)
makimaktuq ! understands not (N)
makittuq ! arises, stands up
makpiqtuq ! opens (as a shirt, coat)
maliktuq ! follows (another)\
malikkaa ! follows him, accompanies him
maliksuktitauruq ! convinced
maliksuktitauruq ! is convinced
mamianaqtuq ! is annoyed, offended
mamittuq ! heals (of sore, cut, etc.)
mamititkaa ! healed him
manaqtuqtuq ! is hooking fish (tomcod) (q)
mapkutittuq ! slaps the water with his tail (beaver)
mapqaqtuq ! reports of a gun, sound of an explosion
mapturuq ! is thick
maqiruq ! drains (of ear, sore etc.), sweats
maqiruq ! sweats (N)
mattaqtuq ! disrobes, removes the harness from a dog
matuniġaa   ! covers it
mauruq ! steps into, falls into a hole, breaks through (of snow)
mauragaaqtuq ! crossing open water by jumping on "stepping stone" ice pans
mayuqtuq ! ascends, climbs up
mayuqtuq ! climbs
maġaalaruq ! yelps with pain (N)
maŋaqtuq ! is black (N)
mikiruq ! is small
miluktuq ! nurses
miluktitkaa ! breast feeds him
miḷuqtuq ! hits with a thrown object
miniksuq ! is misty
minitkaa ! missed him, omitted him
minġuqtuq ! is tired
miquqtuq ! sews (N)
miqłiqtuq ! child (b)
misigaqtuq ! hops
misuktuq ! dips
mitaaqtuq ! jokes
mitautigigaa ! mocks him, makes a fool of him
mitauturuq ! mocks (K)
mitchaaġaqsiruq ! is proceeding to land
miñugluktuq ! is stained, spotted
miñukkaa ! paints it
miñułiġaa   ! paints it
miñułiqtuq ! is painting
miġiaqtuq ! vomits
muliktuq ! is closed, turned off (radio, etc.)
muluruq ! stays a long while
mumiksiruq ! translates
munaġigaa ! watches him, takes care of him
muqpaktuq ! dives (of a sea mammal whose body curves high out of the water)
naaruq ! ends, runs out, finishes
naalaktuq ! listens
naamaruq ! is complete, is enough
naammaktuq ! is fitting, right, perfect
naaqturuq ! is pregnant (K)
naattuq ! is ended, finished, stopped, caught
naavittuq ! dumps out (non-liquid)
naavitkaa ! dumps it (non-liquid) (N)
naavitkaa ! dumps it out
naaġuqtuq ! (moon) is full
nagligigaa ! has compassion on him
nagligigaa ! pities him
nagliginniġaa   ! is merciful to him
naglignaqtuq ! is poor, pitiable (N)
nagliktuq ! is merciful, compassionate
nagliksaaqtitchiruq ! persecute
nagliksraqtuq ! pities
nagliŋnaqtuq ! is poor, pitiable (K)
nairuq ! smells
nairuq ! smells strong, smells foul
naipiqtuq ! watch critically (N)
naipitkaa ! watches it closely, tests it (K)
nakiqtuq ! goes direct (as path of bullet)
nakkaqtuq ! dives, sinks
naktuqtuq ! is chipped
nakuruq ! is cross-eyed
nakuaqsriruq ! likes, loves
nakuqsiruq ! is getting better (K)
nakuuruq ! is good
nakuuruq ! is good
nakuuruq ! is good, fine
nakuugisiruq ! it is going to be good
nakuumaruq ! is in state of being good
nakuupiaġataqtuq ! is extremely good
nakuupiaŋitkaluaqtuq ! although not very good, it is okay
nakuuqsiruq ! is getting better (N)
nakuusimaruq ! now is good (having been ot good)
nakuułallaktuq ! it is very good
nalaunŋaruq ! is right, just
nalauraaqtuq ! rests
nalauttuq ! is right
nalautchaaġaa   ! travels past (N)
nalautchaqtuq ! guesses, gambles
nalautittuq ! fulfills, sights in a rifle
nalautitkaa ! aims it, focuses it
nallaruq ! lays (himself) down
nallaqtuq ! has lain down
nallaqtuq ! lies down
nallautigaa ! lays him down, puts him to bed
naluruq ! is ignorant, does not know
naluktuq ! swims (of sea mammals and polar bear)
nalukataqtuq ! is blanket tossing
naluksriŋuaqtuq ! has a hangover (N)
nalunaqtuq ! is secret, is hidden
nalupqigigaa ! is uncertain about it
nalupqinaqtuq ! is uncertain, unpredictable
nalupqisuktuq ! doubts, is uncertain
nalġuqsruġaa   ! straightens it, corrects him
nalġuqsruiruq ! corrects, instructs
naniqtuq ! is trapped
